District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.08

Detail by Mayor of nonuniformed equal employment opportunity officers and specialists to Office of Human Rights; limitation; uniformed positions unaffected.

The Mayor shall have the authority and is directed to detail, on a full-time basis, all persons who, on May 6, 1976, are employed, on a full-time basis, as nonuniformed equal employment opportunity officers and equal employment opportunity specialists by any agency of the District government other than the Office of Human Rights, to work in the Office of Human Rights as investigators or in other positions, all directly involved in the decision of equal employment opportunity cases instituted against the District government or any of its agencies. No person so detailed shall work on cases instituted against the agency from which the person is detailed. The Mayor shall assign such details on May 6, 1976. The positions which such persons hold shall be transferred to the budget of the Office of Human Rights in and for Fiscal Year 1977. The Metropolitan Police Department and the Fire Department are not authorized by this section to abolish, leave unfilled, or reduce the authority or duties of any uniformed equal employment opportunity officer or specialist position. This section shall not be construed to affect any uniformed position in the District government.

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 9, 22 DCR 6540
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-100, § 2, 23 DCR 8730
1981 Ed., § 1-514.
1973 Ed., § 1-320h.